Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 10. Probation and Parole.

§ 16.1-291.
Revocation or modification of probation, protective supervision or parole; proceedings; disposition.

A juvenile or person who violates an order of the juvenile court entered into pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.10

or §

16.1-284

, who violates the conditions of his probation granted pursuant to §

16.1-278.5

or

16.1-278.8

, or who violates the conditions of his parole granted pursuant to §

16.1-285

,

16.1-285

.1 or

16.1-293

, may be proceeded against for a revocation or modification of such order or parole status. A proceeding to revoke or modify probation, protective supervision or parole shall be commenced by the filing of a petition. Except as otherwise provided, such petitions shall be screened, reviewed and prepared in the same manner and shall contain the same information as provided in §§

16.1-260

and

16.1-262

. The petition shall recite the date that the juvenile or person was placed on probation, under protective supervision or on parole and shall state the time and manner in which notice of the terms of probation, protective supervision or parole were given.

If a juvenile or person is found to have violated a prior order of the court or the terms of probation or parole, the court may, in accordance with the provisions of §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.10

, upon a revocation or modification hearing, modify or extend the terms of the order of probation or parole, including termination of probation or parole. However, notwithstanding the contempt power of the court as provided in §

16.1-292

, the court shall be limited in the actions it may take to those that the court may have taken at the time of the court’s original disposition pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.10

, except as hereinafter provided.

In the event that a child in need of supervision is found to have willfully and materially violated an order of the court or the terms of his probation granted pursuant to §

16.1-278.5

, in addition to or in lieu of the dispositions specified in that section, the court may enter any of the following orders of disposition:

Suspend the child’s driver’s license upon terms and conditions which may include the issuance of a restricted license for those purposes set forth in subsection E of §

18.2-271.1

; or

Order any such child fourteen years of age or older to be (i) placed in a foster home, group home or other nonsecure residential facility, or, (ii) if the court finds that such placement is not likely to meet the child’s needs, that all other treatment options in the community have been exhausted, and that secure placement is necessary in order to meet the child’s service needs, detained in a secure facility for a period of time not to exceed ten consecutive days for violation of any order of the court or violation of probation arising out of the same petition. The court shall state in its order for detention the basis for all findings required by this section. When any child is detained in a secure facility pursuant to this section, the court shall direct the agency evaluating the child pursuant to §

16.1-278.5

to reconvene the interdisciplinary team participating in such evaluation, develop further treatment plans as may be appropriate and submit its report to the court of its determination as to further treatment efforts either during or following the period the child is in secure detention. A child may only be detained pursuant to this section in a detention home or other secure facility in compliance with standards established by the State Board. Any order issued pursuant to this subsection is a final order and is appealable as provided by law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to reclassify a child in need of supervision as a delinquent.

If a person adjudicated delinquent and found to have violated an order of the court or the terms of his probation or parole was a juvenile at the time of the original offense and is eighteen years of age or older when the court enters disposition for violation of the order of the court or the terms of his probation or parole, the dispositional alternative specified in §

16.1-284

shall be available to the court.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-188; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1991, c. 534; 1992, c. 90; 2001, c. 853; 2016, c. 626.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 853, in subsection A, rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read “A child who violates an order of the juvenile court entered into pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.10

or who violates the conditions of his or her parole granted pursuant to §

16.1-293

may be proceeded against for a revocation or modification of such order or parole status,” substituted “juvenile or person” for “child” in the fourth sentence, and deleted the former last sentence in the subsection, which dealt with the procedures to be used in modification or revocation proceedings; in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “juvenile or person” for “child” near the beginning of the sentence, inserted “probation or” preceding “parole,” twice,
inserted “of probation” preceding “or parole,” deleted “or make any other disposition of the child” from the end of the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and added subsections C, D, and E.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626, in the first sentence of subsection A, inserted “or §

16.1-284

” and deleted the section symbol preceding “16.1-278.8,” “16.1-285” and “16.1-293.”

Law Review.

For article, “The Revision of Virginia’s Juvenile Court Law,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 847 (1979).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).

§ 16.1-292.
Violation of court order by any person.

Any person violating an order of the juvenile court entered pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.19

or §

16.1-284

, including a parent subject to an order issued pursuant to subdivision A 3 of §

16.1-278.8

, may be proceeded against (i) by an order requiring the person to show cause why the order of the court entered pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.19

has not been complied with, (ii) for contempt of court pursuant to §

16.1-69.24

or as otherwise provided in this section, or (iii) by both. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, nothing in this chapter shall deprive the court of its power to punish summarily for contempt for such acts as set forth in §

18.2-456

, or to punish for contempt after notice and an opportunity for a hearing on the contempt except that confinement in the case of a juvenile shall be in a secure facility for juveniles rather than in jail and shall not exceed a period of seven days for each offense. However, if the person violating the order was a juvenile at the time of the original act and is 18 years of age or older when the court enters a disposition for violation of the order, the judge may order confinement in jail. If a juvenile is found to have violated a court order as a status offender, any order of disposition of such violation confining the juvenile in a secure facility for juveniles shall (a) identify the valid court order that has been violated; (b) specify the factual basis for determining that there is reasonable cause to believe that the juvenile has violated such order; (c) state the findings of fact that support a determination that there is no appropriate less restrictive alternative available to placing the juvenile in such a facility, with due consideration to the best interest of the juvenile; (d) specify the length of time of such confinement, not to exceed seven days; and (e) include a plan for the juvenile’s release from such facility. Such order of confinement shall not be renewed or extended.

Upon conviction of any party for contempt of court in failing or refusing to comply with an order of a juvenile court for spousal support or child support under §

16.1-278.15

, the court may commit and sentence such party to confinement in a jail, workhouse, city farm, or work squad as provided in §§

20-61

and

20-62

, for a fixed or indeterminate period or until the further order of the court. In no event, however, shall such sentence be imposed for a period of more than 12 months. The sum or sums as provided for in §

20-63

shall be paid as therein set forth, to be used for the support and maintenance of the spouse or the child or children for whose benefit such order or decree provided.

Notwithstanding the contempt power of the court, the court shall be limited in the actions it may take with respect to a child violating the terms and conditions of an order to those which the court could have taken at the time of the court’s original disposition pursuant to §§

16.1-278.2

through

16.1-278.10

, except as hereinafter provided. However, this limitation shall not be construed to deprive the court of its power to (i) punish a child summarily for contempt for acts set forth in §

18.2-456

subject to the provisions of subsection A or (ii) punish a child for contempt for violation of a dispositional order in a delinquency proceeding after notice and an opportunity for a hearing regarding such contempt, including acts of disobedience of the court’s dispositional order which are committed outside the presence of the court.

In the event a child in need of services is found to have willfully and materially violated for a second or subsequent time the order of the court pursuant to §

16.1-278.4

, the dispositional alternatives specified in subdivision A 9 of §

16.1-278.8

shall be available to the court.

In the event that a child in need of supervision is found to have willfully and materially violated an order of the court pursuant to §

16.1-278.5

, the court may enter any of the following orders of disposition:

Suspend the child’s motor vehicle driver’s license;

Order any such child 14 years of age or older to be (i) placed in a foster home, group home, or other nonsecure residential facility or, (ii) if the court finds that such placement is not likely to meet the child’s needs, that all other treatment options in the community have been exhausted, and that secure placement is necessary in order to meet the child’s service needs, detained in a secure facility for a period of time not to exceed seven consecutive days for violation of any order of the court arising out of the same petition. The court shall state in its order for detention the basis for all findings required by this section. In addition, any order of disposition for such violation confining the child in a secure facility for juveniles shall (a) identify the valid court order that has been violated; (b) specify the factual basis for determining that there is reasonable cause to believe that the child has violated such order; (c) state the findings of fact that support a determination that there is no appropriate less restrictive alternative available to placing the child in such a facility, with due consideration to the best interest of the child; (d) specify the length of time of such confinement, not to exceed seven days; and (e) include a plan for the child’s release from such facility. Such order of confinement shall not be renewed or extended. When any child is detained in a secure facility pursuant to this section, the court shall direct the agency evaluating the child pursuant to §

16.1-278.5

to reconvene the interdisciplinary team participating in such evaluation as promptly as possible to review its evaluation, develop further treatment plans as may be appropriate and submit its report to the court for its determination as to further treatment efforts either during or following the period the child is in secure detention. A juvenile may only be detained pursuant to this section in a detention home or other secure facility in compliance with standards established by the State Board. Any order issued pursuant to this subsection is a final order and is appealable to the circuit court as provided by law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to reclassify a child in need of services or in need of supervision as a delinquent.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1983, c. 501; 1985, cc. 1, 260; 1987, c. 632; 1988, c. 771; 1989, c. 725; 1990, c. 110; 1991, c. 534; 1993, c. 632; 1994, c. 21; 2000, c. 978; 2016, c. 626; 2020, c. 593.

Cross references.

As to escapes from juvenile facilities, see §

18.2-477.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, in subdivision E 2, substituted “(d)” for “(iv)” and “(e)” for “(v)” to continue the lettering sequence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 978, in subsection A, deleted the clause (i) designator preceding “in jail” and deleted “or (ii) in a secure facility for juveniles provided the judge finds from the evidence that the presence of the person in such a facility is consistent with assuring the safety of the children confined in the facility and the staff of the facility and the finding is in writing and included in the order” at the end of subsection A.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626 inserted “or §

16.1-284

” near the beginning of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 593, in subsection A, substituted “seven” for “ten” in the second sentence and added the last two sentences; in subsection C, inserted “subject to the provisions of subsection A” in clause (i) in the last sentence; in subsection E, inserted “that” in the introductory language; in subdivision E 2, substituted “seven” for “ten” in clause (ii) in the first sentence and inserted the third and fourth sentences; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 7 Family Support Obligations. § 7.5 Contempt. Rendleman.

§ 16.1-293.
Supervision of juvenile or person during commitment and on parole; placing juvenile in halfway house.

At such time as the court commits a juvenile to the Department, the juvenile and domestic relations district court service unit shall maintain contact with the juvenile during the juvenile’s commitment.

If a person is placed on parole supervision following that person’s release from commitment to the Department, the court services unit providing parole supervision shall furnish the person a written statement of the conditions of his parole and shall instruct him regarding the same. The conditions of the reenrollment plan may be included in the conditions of parole. Violations of parole shall be heard by the court pursuant to §

16.1-291

. If the parole supervision is for an indeterminate period of time, the director of the supervising court services unit may approve termination of parole supervision.

The Department shall notify the school division superintendent in the locality where the person was enrolled of his commitment to a facility. The court services unit shall, in consultation with the local school division, the Department’s Division of Education and the juvenile correctional counselor, develop a reenrollment plan if the person is of compulsory school attendance age or is eligible for special education services pursuant to § 22.1-213. The reenrollment plan shall be in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board of Education pursuant to § 22.1-17.1. The superintendent shall provide the person’s scholastic records, as defined in § 22.1-289, and the terms and conditions of any expulsion which was in effect at the time of commitment or which will be in effect upon release. A court may not order a local school board to reenroll a person who has been expelled in accordance with the procedures set forth in § 22.1-277.06. At least 14 days prior to the person’s scheduled release, the Department shall notify the school division superintendent in the locality where the person will reside.

In the event it is determined by the juvenile and domestic relations district court that a person may benefit from placement in the halfway house program operated by the Department, the person may be referred for care and treatment to a halfway house. Persons so placed in a halfway house shall remain in parole status and cannot be transferred or otherwise placed in another institutional setting or institutional placement operated by the Department except as elsewhere provided by law for those persons who have violated their parole status.

In the event that the person was in the custody of the local department of social services immediately prior to his commitment to the Department and has not attained the age of 18 years, the local department of social services shall resume custody upon the person’s release from commitment, unless an alternative arrangement for the custody of the person has been made and communicated in writing to the Department. At least 90 days prior to the person’s release from commitment on parole supervision, (i) the court services unit shall consult with the local department of social services concerning return of the person to the locality and the placement of the person and (ii) the local department of social services and the court services unit shall collaborate to develop a plan that prepares the person for successful transition from the Department’s commitment to the custody of the local department of social services or to an alternative custody arrangement if applicable. The plan shall identify the services necessary for such transition and how the services are to be provided. The court services unit will be responsible for supervising the person’s terms and conditions of parole.

In the event that the person was in the custody of the local department of social services immediately prior to his commitment to the Department, is between 18 and 21 years of age, provides written notice of his intent to receive independent living services to the local department of social services, and enters into a written agreement with the local department of social services as set forth in §

63.2-905.1

, the person shall be eligible to receive independent living services from the local department or a child-placing agency pursuant to §

63.2-905.1

. At least 90 days prior to the person’s release from commitment on parole supervision, (i) the court services unit shall inform the person of the availability of independent living services and shall consult with the local department of social services concerning return of the person to the locality and living arrangements for the person and (ii) the local department of social services and the court services unit shall work collaboratively to develop a plan for the successful transition of the person from the custody of the Department to independent living, which shall identify the services necessary to facilitate the person’s transition to independent living and describe how the necessary services shall be provided.

In all cases in which a person who is in the custody of the local department of social services is committed to the Department, the local department of social services and the Department shall work cooperatively through the duration of the person’s commitment to ensure communication of information regarding the status of the person and to facilitate transition planning for the person prior to his release.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-210; 1956, c. 555; 1962, c. 628; 1972, cc. 73, 708; 1973, cc. 440, 546; 1977, c. 559; 1980, c. 217; 1981, c. 487; 1985, c. 203; 1988, c. 453; 1996, cc. 755, 914, 916, 1000; 2001, cc. 688, 820, 853; 2010, c. 742; 2011, cc. 39, 442; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2013, cc. 362, 564.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2013, c. 564, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”

Acts 2013, c. 564, cl. 3 provides: “That the General Assembly determines that the requirements of the second enactment of this act have been met.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “juvenile” for “child” throughout the section, substituted “juvenile’s” for “child’s” preceding “commitment” near the beginning of the first paragraph, added the present second paragraph, and added the present second sentence of the third paragraph, and in the final paragraph, substituted “Juveniles” for “Children” and substituted “juveniles” for “children.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 688 and 820 are identical, and substituted “the procedures set forth in § 22.1-277.06” for “§ 22.1-277” in the fifth sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2001 amendment by c. 853, in the first paragraph, deleted “it shall determine whether” following “Department,” and deleted “or the local department of public welfare or social services” following “unit” in the first sentence, and deleted the former second and third sentences, which dealt with the jurisdiction of the local departments of public welfare and social services; in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “If a person is placed on parole supervision following that person’s release from commitment to the Department, the court services unit providing parole supervision” for “The local supervising agency” at the beginning of the sentence and substituted “person” for “juvenile,” and in the fourth sentence, inserted “If the parole supervision is for an indeterminate period of time,” at the beginning thereof and substituted “court services unit” for “agency”; deleted “or local department of public welfare or social services” following “unit” in the second sentence of the third paragraph; substituted “person” or “persons“ for “juvenile” or “juveniles” four times in the fourth paragraph; and added the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 742 substituted “person” for “juvenile” and “person’s” for “juvenile’s” throughout the third paragraph, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 39 and 442 are identical, and in the last paragraph, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The court services unit shall consult with the local department of social services four week prior to the person’s release from commitment on parole supervision concerning return of the person to the locality and the placement of the person,” and added the second and third sentences.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and substituted “with the local school division, the Department’s Division of Education” for “with the Department of Correctional Education, the local school division” in the second sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 362 and 564 are identical, and added the last two paragraphs.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2515. Placement Order.

§ 16.1-293.1.
Mental health services transition plan.

The Board of Juvenile Justice, after consultation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall promulgate regulations for the planning and provision of post-release services for persons committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

or placed in a postdispositional detention program pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-284.1

and identified as having a recognized mental health, substance abuse, or other therapeutic treatment need. The plan shall be in writing and completed prior to the person’s release. The purpose of the plan shall be to ensure continuity of necessary treatment and services.

The mental health services transition plan shall identify the mental health, substance abuse, or other therapeutic needs of the person being released. Appropriate treatment providers and other persons from state and local agencies or entities, as defined by the Board, shall participate in the development of the plan. Appropriate family members, caregivers, or other persons, as defined by the Board, shall be invited to participate in the development of the person’s plan.

Prior to the person’s release from incarceration, the identified agency or agencies responsible for the case management of the mental health services transition plan shall make the necessary referrals specified in the plan and assist the person in applying for insurance and other services identified in the plan, including completing and submitting applications that may only be submitted upon release.

History.

2005, cc. 334, 405; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 334 and 405, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Juvenile Justice, in conjunction with the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Department of Behavioral Health and Development Services], shall consult state and local, and private and public entities, including, but not limited to, the Departments of Correctional Education, Education, Medical Assistance Services, Rehabilitative Services, and Social Services, prior to promulgating the regulations for the planning and provision of post-release service for persons committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice pursuant to subdivision A 14 of §

16.1-278.8

or placed in a postdispositional detention program pursuant to §

16.1-284.1

and identified as having a recognized mental health, substance abuse, or other therapeutic treatment need.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” near the beginning of subsection A.

§ 16.1-294.
Placing child on parole in foster home or with institution; how cost paid.

When the child is returned to the custody of the court for parole supervision by the court service unit or the local department of social services for supervision, and, after a full investigation, the court is of the opinion that the child should not be placed in his home or is in need of treatment, and there are no funds available to board and maintain the child or to purchase the needed treatment services, the court service unit or the local department of social services shall arrange with the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice for the boarding of the child in a foster home or with any private institution, society or association or for the purchase of treatment services. In determining the proper placement for such a child, the Department may refer the child to the locality’s family assessment and planning team for assessment and recommendation for services. The cost of maintaining such child shall be paid monthly, according to schedules prepared and adopted by the Department, out of funds appropriated for such purposes. Treatment services for such child shall be paid from funds appropriated to the Department for such purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-211; 1956, c. 555; 1972, cc. 73, 708; 1973, c. 546; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 559; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1985, c. 203; 1988, c. 376; 1989, c. 733; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, cc. 837 and 880, cl. 5, as amended by Acts 1993, c. 232, cls. 1 and 2 provide that the amendment to this section by the 1992 acts shall become effective July 1, 1993.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, twice deleted “public welfare or” preceding “social services” in the first sentence.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

§ 16.1-295.
Transfer of supervision from one county or city to another, or to another state.

If any person on probation to or under the supervision of any juvenile probation officer or other officer of the court removes his residence or place of abode from the county or city in which he was so placed on probation or under supervision to another county or city in the Commonwealth, the court in the city or county from which he removed his residence or place of abode may then arrange the transfer of the supervision to the city or county to which he moves his place of residence or abode, or such transfer may be ordered by the transferring court.

The Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice may make provision for the transfer of a juvenile placed on probation in this Commonwealth to another state to be there placed on probation under the terms of Article 4 (§

53.1-166

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 53.1.

The costs of returning juveniles on probation or parole to their places of residence, whether within or outside of this Commonwealth, shall be paid in accordance with regulations established by the State Board from funds appropriated in the general appropriation act for criminal costs.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-212; 1956, c. 555; 1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 559; 1989, c. 733.